Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1580.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; fire incident management exemption A. The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the following entities for a fire incident management: 1. Pinetop fire district                             $ 49,700 2. Vernon fire district                              $  145,700 3. Surprise fire-medical department                  $ 99,400 4. Gilbert fire and rescue                           $  160,900 5. Buckeye fire-medical-rescue department            $ 49,700 6. Goodyear fire department                          $  132,500 7. Daisy Mountain fire district                      $ 49,700 8. Scottsdale fire department                        $ 1,044,000 9. Chandler fire department                          $  552,400 10. Superstition fire department                     $  261,000 B. The monies appropriated pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be used for hardware and software that: 1. Enable the statewide deployment of a secure incident management platform to fire and law enforcement agencies. 2. Provide a standardized incident command and management platform based on federal emergency management agency standards that enable diverse incident management and support entities to work together and ensure the following: (a) A clearly defined chain of command. (b) The use of common terminology. (c) The safety of first responders and others. (d) The achievement of response objectives. (e) The efficient use of resources. 3. Provide a collaboration and communications solution that does the following: (a) Identifies the location, status and assignment of assigned resources. (b) Allows status updates, tracking and management of an incident. (c) Allows secure messaging and file sharing to all users involved in an incident. (d) Allows the sharing of collaborative maps, building floor plans and images between public safety agencies. (e) Allows collaboration and information sharing between disparate agencies during a mass casualty incident. (f) Defines a federal emergency management agency or national incident management systems based organizational structure for the management of incidents. (g) Provides the ability to print standard integrated computer solutions forms for tracking and cost reimbursement. (h) Provides enhanced telemetry-based firefighter safety monitoring. (i) Works in areas without internet access in a disconnected mode. (j) Provides a seamless and connected platform for notification, response and rostering. (k) Provides cross platform functionality. (l) Provides a smartphone-based application for notification, accountability and situational awareness. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.